test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Nouns_MascAnim_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - официант M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      официант+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Nom: официант
      официант+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc: официанта
      официант+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Gen: официанта
      официант+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Loc: официанте
      официант+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Dat: официанту
      официант+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Ins: официантом
      официант+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Nom: официанты
      официант+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Acc: официантов
      официант+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Gen: официантов
      официант+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Loc: официантах
      официант+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Dat: официантам
      официант+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Ins: официантами
  Noun - сосед M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      сосед+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Nom: сосед
      сосед+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc: соседа
      сосед+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Gen: соседа
      сосед+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Loc: соседе
      сосед+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Dat: соседу
      сосед+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Ins: соседом
      сосед+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Nom: соседи
      сосед+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Acc: соседей
      сосед+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Gen: соседей
      сосед+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Loc: соседях
      сосед+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Dat: соседям
      сосед+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Ins: соседями
  Noun - студент M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
     студент+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Nom: студент
     студент+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc: студента
     студент+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Gen: студента
     студент+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Loc: студенте
     студент+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Dat: студенту
     студент+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Ins: студентом
     студент+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Nom: студенты
     студент+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Acc: студентов
     студент+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Gen: студентов
     студент+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Loc: студентах
     студент+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Dat: студентам
     студент+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Ins: студентами
  Noun - гость M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      гость+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Nom: гость
      гость+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc: гостя
      гость+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Gen: гостя
      гость+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Loc: госте
      гость+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Dat: гостю
      гость+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Ins: гостем
      гость+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Nom: гости
      гость+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Acc: гостей
      гость+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Gen: гостей
      гость+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Loc: гостях
      гость+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Dat: гостям
      гость+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Ins: гостями
  Noun - конь M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      конь+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Nom: конь
      конь+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc: коня
      конь+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Gen: коня
      конь+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Loc: коне
      конь+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Dat: коню
      конь+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Ins: [конём, конем]
      конь+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Nom: кони
      конь+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Acc: коней
      конь+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Gen: коней
      конь+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Loc: конях
      конь+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Dat: коням
      конь+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Ins: конями
